Tennessee, session 114, HB1678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-201, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting:
(1)
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(1)(B), a violation of subdivision
(b)(1)(A) or (b)(2)(A) is a Class C felony.
(B) A violation of subdivision (b)(1)(A) or (b)(2)(A) is a Class B felony if
the violation resulted in the death of another person.
(2)
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2)(B), a violation of subdivision
(b)(1)(B), (b)(1)(C), or (b)(2)(B) is a Class D felony.
(B) A violation of subdivision (b)(1)(B), (b)(1)(C), or (b)(2)(B) is a Class C
felony if the violation resulted in the death of another person.
(3)
(A) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(3)(B), a violation of subdivision
(b)(2)(C) is a Class E felony. A first violation is punishable only by fine. A
second or subsequent violation is punishable only by a fine of three thousand
dollars ($3,000).
(B) A violation of subdivision (b)(2)(C) is a Class D felony if the violation
resulted in the death of another person.
HB1678
011193
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011193